Utah statutes.
39-6-66.   Principal defined.
A person subject to this chapter is a principal, who:
(1)  commits an offense punishable under this chapter, or aids, abets,
counsels, commands, or procures the commission of the offense; or
(2)  causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him would be
punishable by this chapter.
